Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201890-560
Transfer to Site and Building Development Fund.

The State Treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from the General Fund to the Site and Building Development Fund on or before June 30, 2016.

Laws 2016, LB957, § 22.